Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2810
Person in custody of officer; delivery to another officer prohibited; penalty; exceptions.

If any person of this state shall be committed to prison, or be in custody of any officer for any criminal matter, such prisoner shall not be removed therefrom into the custody of any other officer, unless by legal process, or when the prisoner shall be delivered to some inferior officer to carry to jail, or shall, by order of the proper court, be removed from one place to another within the state for trial, or in case of fire, infection or other necessity; and if any person, after such commitment, shall make out or sign or countersign any warrant for such removal, contrary to this section, he or she shall for every such offense forfeit to the party aggrieved five hundred dollars.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 362, p. 806;

R.S.1913, § 9256;

C.S.1922, § 10285;

C.S.1929, § 29-2810;

R.S.1943, § 29-2810.